firefox-esr/l10n-pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.aff
SFX K   azer            izeram/PL               fazer
SFX K   azer            izera/PL                fazer
SFX K   azer            izeras/PL               fazer
SFX K   azer            izéramos/PL             fazer
SFX K   azer            izéreis/PL              fazer
SFX K   azer            izeram/PL               fazer
SFX K   zer             rei/PL                  fazer
SFX K   zer             rás/PL                  fazer
SFX K   zer             rá/PL                   fazer
SFX K   zer             remos/PL                fazer
SFX K   zer             reis/PL                 fazer
SFX K   zer             rão/PL                  fazer
SFX K   zer             ça/PL                   fazer
SFX K   zer             ças/PL                  fazer
SFX K   zer             çamos/PL                fazer
SFX K   zer             çais/PL                 fazer
SFX K   zer             çam/PL                  fazer
SFX K   azer            izesse/PL               fazer
SFX K   azer            izesses/PL              fazer
SFX K   azer            izéssemos/PL            fazer
SFX K   azer            izésseis/PL             fazer
SFX K   azer            izessem/PL              fazer
SFX K   azer            izer/PL                 fazer
SFX K   azer            izeres/PL               fazer
SFX K   azer            izer/PL                 fazer
SFX K   azer            izermos/PL              fazer
SFX K   azer            izerdes/PL              fazer
SFX K   azer            izerem/PL               fazer
SFX K   zer             ria/PL                  fazer
SFX K   zer             rias/PL                 fazer
SFX K   zer             ríamos/PL               fazer
SFX K   zer             ríeis/PL                fazer
SFX K   zer             riam/PL                 fazer
SFX K   zer             z/PL                    fazer
SFX K   zer             ça/PL                   fazer
SFX K   zer             çamos/PL                fazer
SFX K   r               i/PL                    fazer
SFX K   zer             çam/PL                  fazer
SFX K   r               ndo/PL                  fazer
SFX K   azer            eito/PL                 fazer
SFX K   azer            eita/PL                 fazer
SFX K   azer            eitos/PL                fazer
SFX K   azer            eitas/PL                fazer
SFX K   0               es/PL                   fazer
SFX K   0               mos/PL                  fazer
SFX K   0               des/PL                  fazer
SFX K   0               em/PL                   fazer
SFX K   zer             go/PL                   dizer
SFX K   r               s/PL                    dizer
SFX K   zer             z/PL                    dizer
SFX K   r               mos/PL                  dizer
SFX K   r               is/PL                   dizer
SFX K   r               m/PL                    dizer
SFX K   er              ia/PL                   dizer
SFX K   er              ias/PL                  dizer
SFX K   er              íamos/PL                dizer
SFX K   er              íeis/PL                 dizer
SFX K   er              iam/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             sse/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             sseste/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             sse/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             ssemos/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             ssestes/PL              dizer
SFX K   zer             sseram/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             ssera/PL                dizer
SFX K   zer             sseras/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             sséramos/PL             dizer
SFX K   zer             sséreis/PL              dizer
SFX K   zer             sseram/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             rei/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             rás/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             rá/PL                   dizer
SFX K   zer             remos/PL                dizer
SFX K   zer             reis/PL                 dizer
SFX K   zer             rão/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             ga/PL                   dizer
SFX K   zer             gas/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             gamos/PL                dizer
SFX K   zer             gais/PL                 dizer
SFX K   zer             gam/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             ssesse/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             ssesses/PL              dizer
SFX K   zer             sséssemos/PL            dizer
SFX K   zer             ssésseis/PL             dizer
SFX K   zer             ssessem/PL              dizer
SFX K   zer             sser/PL                 dizer
SFX K   zer             sseres/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             sser/PL                 dizer
SFX K   zer             ssermos/PL              dizer
SFX K   zer             sserdes/PL              dizer
SFX K   zer             sserem/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             ria/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             rias/PL                 dizer
SFX K   zer             ríamos/PL               dizer
SFX K   zer             ríeis/PL                dizer
SFX K   zer             riam/PL                 dizer
SFX K   zer             z/PL                    dizer
SFX K   zer             ga/PL                   dizer
SFX K   zer             gamos/PL                dizer
SFX K   r               i/PL                    dizer
SFX K   zer             gam/PL                  dizer
SFX K   r               ndo/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             to/PL                   dizer
SFX K   zer             ta/PL                   dizer
SFX K   zer             tos/PL                  dizer
SFX K   zer             tas/PL                  dizer
SFX K   0               es/PL                   dizer
SFX K   0               mos/PL                  dizer
SFX K   0               des/PL                  dizer
SFX K   0               em/PL                   dizer
